Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.425

Termination of registration.

The registration of a foreign corporation to conduct affairs in this state may be terminated by the secretary of state in accordance with RCW 23.95.550.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4129; 1982 c 35 s 150; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 85.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.